Tennessee, session 114, HB1177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 33-7-301(d), is amended by deleting
the subsection in its entirety.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 52-6-102(e)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision in its entirety.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1177
001626
- 1 -